Washington statutes.
RCW 13.60.030

Information and education regarding missing children—Plan.

The superintendent of public instruction shall meet semiannually with the Washington state patrol to develop a coordinated plan for the distribution of information and education of teachers and students in the school districts of the state regarding the missing children problem in the state. The superintendent of public instruction shall encourage local school districts to cooperate by providing the state patrol information on any missing children that may be identified within the district.

[ 1985 c 443 s 24.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 443: See notes following RCW 7.69.010.